Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,280
Approved protective helmets.

The Department of Motor Vehicles shall publish a list of approved protective helmets which meet the requirements of section 60-6,279. Such list shall not be inclusive. Any person wearing a protective helmet which meets the requirements established pursuant to such section shall be deemed to be in compliance with such section.

Laws 1988, LB 428, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,212;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 376.

Since the list required by this section is noninclusive, it does not improperly delegate to the Department of Motor Vehicles the authority to define the essential elements of a crime. Robotham v. State, 241 Neb. 379, 488 N.W.2d 533 (1992).